Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
INDIVIDUAL CLAIMS REVIEW PANEL

[§674-3] Establishment of the board of
individual claims resolution. There shall be a Hawaiian home lands trust
individual claims review panel to be composed of five members and appointed as
follows: the chairperson shall be appointed by the governor and shall be a
former federal or state court judge, where possible, or an attorney licensed to
practice law in the courts of the State. The governor shall appoint the
remaining four members, all of whom shall be from nominations submitted by
native Hawaiian organizations as defined in section 673-2. No more than two of
the members shall be residents of the same island.

All of these appointments shall be subject to
senatorial confirmation. The panel shall be placed within the department of
commerce and consumer affairs for administrative purposes. [L 1991, c 323, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next